test/lexicon.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
 {kg} {kj} {kv} {kØ} {kØ'} {pm} {pv} {pØ} {td} {tl} {tn} {tr} {tØ} {aä}

LEXICON Root
kan{kg}i Aff;
ar{kj}i Aff;
pu{kv}u Aff;
pa{kØ}o Aff;
vaa{kØ'}a Aff;
kam{pm}a Aff;
ar{pv}a Aff;
pap{pØ}i Aff;
ka{td}u Aff;
val{tl}a Aff;
kan{tn}o Aff;
par{tr}a Aff;
kat{tØ}o Aff;
LEXICON Aff
 #;
n #;
na #;
sta #;
lla #;
